District of Columbia statutes.
15-132

Repealed

Enforceable period of unrecorded judgments; enforcement of judgments, etc., of the District of Columbia Court of General Sessions

Repealed.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 553, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 144(4)(A)
1981 Ed., §§ 15-131 to 15-133.